Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.055

Articles—Filing.

(1) The articles of incorporation shall be signed by the incorporators and delivered to the secretary of state for filing in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation, the corporate existence shall begin, and the certificate of incorporation shall, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation, be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the corporation has been incorporated under this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9104; 1989 c 307 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.